Utah, session 2026, HB347.
Section 1. Section 53G-7-228 is enacted to read:53G-7-228. Artificial turf installation -- Notice and meeting requirements.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Artificial turf" means a surface of synthetic fibers made to resemble natural grass, including any infill material such as crumb rubber.(b)"Athletic field" means an area designed and used for organized sports activities, including soccer fields, lacrosse fields, football fields, baseball fields, and similar recreational surfaces of at least 5,000 square feet.(c)"Installation" means the initial placement of artificial turf on an athletic field on LEA property.(d)"LEA governing board" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-303.(e)"Property owner" means an individual or entity that:(i)owns real property with a property boundary within the notification radius established under Subsection (4); or(ii)resides on real property with a property boundary within the notification radius established under Subsection (4).(2)Before installing artificial turf on LEA property, an LEA governing board shall:(a)provide notice in accordance with Subsections (3) and (4); and(b)place the proposed installation on a regular meeting agenda in accordance with Subsection (5).(3)(a)An LEA governing board shall provide written notice to each property owner or property resident within the notification radius established under Subsection (4) at least 30 days before the date of the meeting required under Subsection (5).(b)The LEA governing board shall deliver the written notice required under Subsection (3)(a) by:(i)mailing the notice by United States mail to the property address; or(ii)hand delivering the notice to the property address.(c)The written notice shall include:(i)a description of the proposed artificial turf installation, including:(A)the location of the proposed installation;(B)the size of the proposed installation;(C)the type of artificial turf and infill material proposed; and(D)the intended use of the artificial turf;(ii)in accordance with Subsection (4), the notification radius used;(iii)the date, time, and location of the meeting required under Subsection (5);(iv)a statement that the property owner may appear at the meeting to provide comment on the proposed installation;(v)contact information for the LEA where the property owner may obtain additional information about the proposed installation; and(vi)information for the online location where the property owner may obtain additional information and updates on the proposed installation.(d)In addition to the written notice required under Subsection (3)(a), at least 60 days before the date of the meeting, an LEA governing board shall post a notice of the proposed installation and meeting on the LEA's website.(e)Notwithstanding any notice requirements under Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, an LEA governing board shall:(i)update the website posting required under Subsection (3)(d) within seven days after a change to the proposed installation is made before the noticed meeting where the proposed installation will be discussed or voted on; and(ii)clearly state that an update has been made, including highlighting where to find the changes and explaining what the changes are.(f)(i)The LEA governing board shall maintain documentation demonstrating compliance with the notice requirements of this Subsection (3), including:(A)maintaining a list of property owners notified for the sole purpose of demonstrating compliance with this section;(B)copies of written notices sent; and(C)documentation of website posting.(ii)A list maintained under this Subsection (3)(f) may be discarded after the governing board takes final action on the installation and does not create a new record retention requirement beyond those imposed under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.(4)(a)An LEA governing board shall determine the notification radius by measuring from the outer edge of the proposed artificial turf installation to property boundaries of surrounding properties.(b)The notification radius described in Subsection (4)(a) shall be 200 feet.(5)(a)An LEA governing board shall include the proposed artificial turf installation as an agenda item at a regular meeting of the LEA governing board.(b)The meeting described in Subsection (5)(a) shall be conducted in compliance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(c)At the meeting, the LEA governing board shall:(i)present information about the proposed artificial turf installation; and(ii)allow property owners and members of the public to provide public comment on the proposed installation.(6)An LEA governing board may not approve installation of artificial turf until the requirements of this section have been met.(7)This section does not:(a)prohibit an LEA governing board from installing artificial turf after complying with the requirements of this section;(b)create a private right of action for property owners or other persons;(c)require an LEA to conduct environmental testing or studies beyond what is otherwise required by law; or(d)supersede any other notice or meeting requirements established by state or federal law.(8)The notice and meeting requirements of this section do not apply to:(a)maintenance, repair, or resurfacing of existing artificial turf; or(b)replacement of artificial turf with natural grass or another surface that is not artificial turf.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.